North Dakota statutes. TITLE 9 Contracts And Obligations
CHAPTER 9-15.1 Uniform Athlete Agents Act [Repealed]

9-15.1-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-02.
Service of process — Subpoenas. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-03.
Athlete agents — Registration required — Void contracts. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-04.
Registration as athlete agent. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-05.
Certificate of registration — Issuance or denial — Renewal. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-06.
Suspension, revocation, or refusal to renew registration. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-07.
Temporary registration. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-08.
Registration and renewal fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-09.
Required form of contract. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-10.
Notice to educational institution. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-11.
Student-athlete’s right to cancel. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 11; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-12.
Required records. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 12; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-13.
Prohibited conduct. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 13; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-14.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 14; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-15.
Civil remedies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 15; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

9-15.1-16.
Administrative penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 81, § 16; repealed by 2017, ch. 79, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.